Rhode Island, session 2025, SB669.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-7.1 of the General Laws entitled "The Paul W. Crowley Rhode
Island Student Investment Initiative [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-7.1-5.3. Extension of turnaround action plan terminated.
The extension of control issued by the department of elementary and secondary education
relative to the turnaround status of the Providence public school district (PPSD), issued on August
29, 2024, pursuant to § 16-7.1-5.1 extending the PPSD's turnaround action plan to October 15,
2027 is hereby null and void and terminated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC001619
========